tests/test_files/apertium-kaz.kaz.lexc
LEXICON PRON-REF

! FIXME JNW please have a look at this
! Listing all forms here because of overgeneration with *өздерім,
! *өздеріміз, *өзіңдер etc while linking to POSSESSIVES. This was the idea.
! Now they are handled more like personal pronouns (the same tags in the same
! order), so they should pass transfer without any trouble.
!-----
! A remaining problem with reflexive pronoun is that it takes personal copula
! suffixes "selectively": e.g. prn.refl.px1sg would take only cop.px1sg
! (prn.ref.px3sp seems to take all of them though).
! A little bit of overgeneration won't hurt anyone :), but I think that odd
! forms could be filtered out somehow later. Don't know how to do it./04Aug, IS/

! FIXME DISCUSS Write full forms for the lower side and put only PRON-DEF in the
! Root Lexicon

%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}м PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}ң PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px3sp%>:%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} PRON-REF-ADV ; ! FIXME <px3sg>?
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px1pl%>:%>%{I%}м%{I%}з PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px2pl%>:%>д%{A%}р%>%{I%}ң PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px3pl%>:%>д%{A%}р%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} PRON-REF-ADV ;

%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px2sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з PRON-REF-ADV ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<px2pl%>%<frm%>:%>д%{A%}р%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з PRON-REF-ADV ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     DETERMINERS

LEXICON DET-DEM

%<det%>%<dem%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-QNT

%<det%>%<qnt%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-IND

%<det%>%<ind%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-ITG

%<det%>%<itg%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-NEG

%<det%>%<neg%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-REF

%<det%>%<ref%>: # ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     OTHER PART-OF-SPEECH LEXICONS

LEXICON N1-ABBR

%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<n%>:%- POSSESSIVES ;
%<n%>:%- CASES-ETC ;
%<n%>: CASES-ETC ; ! Dir/LR


LEXICON N1

%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<n%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON N1-Ә

:%{ә%} N1 ;            ! generate front for {I} and back for {A} - куәні, куәға
:ә%{ъ%} N1 ;  ! Dir/LR ! analyse all back forms
:ә N1 ;       ! Dir/LR ! analyse all front forms

LEXICON N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON
 
:%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES-ETC ;
POSSESSIVES ;       ! for stuff like "біздің ауа райымыз" and even "оның ауа райы",
                  ! which should have a <px3sp> analysis


LEXICON N-COMPOUND-PX ! consider "N2" for the name
                      ! equiv of kir:LEXICON N-INFL-3PX-COMPOUND

%<n%>: N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES-ETC ; ! (e.g. чик сакчылары=пограничники)
                                                      !  FIXME CHECK: Is {S} needed here ?

LEXICON N-COMPOUND-PX-PL
! for things like Олимпиада ойындары

%<n%>%<pl%>: N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON ; ! FIXME: do we want these to get <pl>??


LEXICON N3
! Singularia tantum

%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<n%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON N5

:%{☭%} N1 ;

LEXICON N6

:%{і%} N1 ; 
N1 ;  ! Dir/LR     ! We want to analyse forms without %{і%}, since they're used
                   ! but "properly" we want to generate forms with %{і%}

LEXICON N-INFL-NKI

%<n%>:%{I%}н KI ; ! Dir/LR - common variant in both Kazakh and Kyrgyz
%<n%>:%{I%}ң KI ; 
%<n%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;


!LEXICON NAT
! Nationalites

!A1 ;              ! nationality's adjectival form, e.g. "Turkish [food]" ! Consider <n.attr> reading for this 
!N1 ;              ! a member of the nationality, e.g. "A Turk"
!:%>ш%{A%} ADV ;   ! as / in the style of the nat., e.g. "à la Turk"
!:%>ш%{A%} ADV ;   ! in the language of the nationality, e.g. "in Turkish" ! I guess ADJ was meant /I.S./
!:%>ш%{A%} N1 ;    ! the language of the nationality, e.g. "Turkish"

LEXICON ADV-LANG

N1 ;
ADV ;

LEXICON NP-COMMON
FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON NP-TOP-RUS

%<np%>%<top%>:%{☭%} NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON NP-TOP

%<np%>%<top%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>: # ;

!%<adj%>%<top%>:%{L%}%{I%}%{K%} ADJ-COMMON ;  ! FIXME: do these tags make sense?

LEXICON NP-TOP-ASSR

%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>: # ;

%<np%>%<top%>: NP-COMMON ; ! Dir/LR
%<np%>%<top%>:%- NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-TOP-COMPOUND

%<np%>%<top%>: N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} # ;

LEXICON NP-TOP-ABBR

%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<nom%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<np%>%<top%>:%- NP-COMMON ;

%<np%>%<top%>: NP-COMMON ;    ! Dir/LR   ! also allow like this to be parsed, but generate with -


LEXICON NP-ANT-M

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-F

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-M

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-MF

! Dual-gender cognoms.
! Don't derive anything /I.S./

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-OBIN-FEM

%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>:а NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>%<pl%>:а%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;


LEXICON NP-COG-OB

! For cognoms ending with -ов, -ев
! They derive feminine equivalets taking -а /I.S./
! Also, even the ев ones are normally pronounced
!    (and take harmony) as if they end in йыф/йып

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>:%{☭%} NP-COMMON ;                       ! Dir/LR
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%{☭%}%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;    ! Dir/LR

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>:%{а%}%{с%} NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%{а%}%{с%}%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

NP-COG-OBIN-FEM ;


LEXICON NP-COG-IN

! For cognoms ending with -ов, -ев, -ин
! They derive feminine equivalets taking -а /I.S./

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>:%{☭%} NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<pl%>:%{☭%}%>%{L%}%{A%}р NP-COMMON ;

NP-COG-OBIN-FEM ;

! LEXICON NPCOGFLEX

! This isn't used at the moment,
! but e.g. ?Polish cognoms ending with -ска would take this cont.class /I.S./ 

LEXICON NP-PAT-VICH

! For patronyms ending with -вич
! Their feminine equivalets end with -вна /I.S./

%<np%>%<pat%>%<m%>:вич%{☭%} NP-COMMON ;

%<np%>%<pat%>%<f%>:вна NP-COMMON ;

! WAS: (JNW 2015-01-17)
!LEXICON NP-ORG
!
!%<np%>%<org%>: CASES ; 

LEXICON NP-ORG

%<np%>%<org%>%<nom%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<np%>%<org%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION-NONOM ;
%<np%>%<org%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON NP-ORG-LAT

%<np%>%<org%>%<nom%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<np%>%<org%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
%<np%>%<org%>:%- FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION-NONOM ;
! This one doesn't work right because of twol:
!%<np%>%<org%>:%' FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION-NONOM-NONOM ; ! Dir/LR
%<np%>%<org%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON NP-ORG-COMPOUND 

%<np%>%<org%>: N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON ;   ! COMMON because no plural

LEXICON NP-ORG-ABBR             ! for abbreviations like FIFA
%<np%>%<org%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<np%>%<org%>%<nom%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<np%>%<org%>:%- NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<org%>: NP-COMMON ;    ! Dir/LR   ! also allow like this to be parsed, but generate with -

LEXICON NP-AL

%<np%>%<al%>: CASES ;

LEXICON NP-AL-ABBR              ! for abbreviations like ӘЧ - Әлем Чемпионаты
%<np%>%<al%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<np%>%<al%>%<nom%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;
%<np%>%<al%>:%- NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<al%>: NP-COMMON ;    ! Dir/LR   ! also allow like this to be parsed, but generate with -


LEXICON NUM-COMMON

%<num%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON NUM

NUM-COMMON ;
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{I%}нш%{I%} # ;             ! FIXME: base form, <det> reading
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>:%>%{I%}нш%{I%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

! <ord> is "det" is base form, <ord><subst> is "prn" reading

LEXICON NUM-TWENTY

NUM-COMMON ;
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>с%{I%}нш%{I%} # ;
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>:%>с%{I%}нш%{I%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON NUM-ITG ! This is a temporal solution
                ! (could be integrated with the above)

%<num%>%<itg%>: # ;
%<num%>%<itg%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;
%<num%>%<itg%>%<ord%>:%>%{I%}нш%{I%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON NUM-COLL

%<num%>%<coll%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;
%<num%>%<coll%>%<advl%>: # ;

LEXICON NUM-ROMAN

%<num%>%<ord%>: # ;

!LEXICON DIGITLEX
!
!%<num%>: # ;

LEXICON POST

%<post%>: CLITICS-NO-COP ;

 LEXICON Postpositions
қарай:қарай POST ; ! "toward" + DAT
таяу:таяу POST ;
 LEXICON Determiners
ол:ол DET-DEM ;
ол:ол DET-DEM ;
осынау:осынау DET-DEM ;
бірнеше:бірнеше DET-QNT ; ! "some"
көп:көп DET-QNT ; ! "many"
миллиондаған:миллиондаған DET-QNT ; ! ""
қайсыбір:қайсыбір DET-IND ; ! "some"
сондай:сондай DET-IND ; ! "such" !Use/MT
қай:қай DET-ITG ; ! "which"
қайсы:қайсы DET-ITG ; ! "which"
кім:кім DET-ITG ; ! !"whose" Use/MT
ешбір:ешбір DET-NEG ; ! "none, no"
ешқандай:ешқандай DET-NEG ; ! "no [kind of], none"
өз:өз DET-REF ; ! "oneself's"
 LEXICON Numerals
он% алты:он% алты NUM ; ! "sixteen"
жиырма:жиырма NUM-TWENTY ; ! "twenty"
бес% жүз:бес% жүз NUM ; ! "fivehundred"
үшеу:үшеу NUM-COLL ;
бесеу:бесеу NUM-COLL ;
VI NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
неше:неше NUM-ITG ;
қанша:қанша NUM-ITG ;
 LEXICON Nouns
Аллаһ% Тағала:аллаһ% тағала N3 ; ! Dir/LR
борсықтың% балалары:борсықтың% балалар N-COMPOUND-PX-PL ; ! "" ! Use/MT
жалақы% көлемі:жалақы% көлем N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! "maaş"! Use/MT
Иудаизм:иудаизм N5 ; ! ""
қазіргі% заман:қазіргі% заман N3 ; ! "" Use/MT
кінә:кін N1-Ә ; ! "guilt"
контракт:контракт N6 ; ! ""
көрегендік:көрегендік N1 ; ! ""
куә:ку N1-Ә ; ! "witness"
күнә:күн N1-Ә ; ! "sin"
норматив:норматив N5 ; ! "" ! Use/MT
Рамазан:рамазан N3 ; ! ""
субъект:субъект N6 ; ! ""
хабарландыру% тақтасы:хабарландыру% тақта N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! "billboard"
шабу:шабу N1 ; !
каталог:каталог N5 ; ! "catalogue"
млн:млн%{а%}%{з%} N1-ABBR ; ! "million"
млрд:млрд%{а%}%{с%} N1-ABBR ; ! "billion"
мм:мм%{э%}%{з%} N1-ABBR ; ! "mm"
арт:арт N-INFL-NKI ; ! "back"
аст:аст N-INFL-NKI ; ! "under"
үст:үст N-INFL-NKI ; ! "top"
аэрозоль:аэрозоль N1 ; ! 
күн% тәртібі:күн% тәртіп N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON ; ! "schedule"
Олимпиада% ойындары:Олимпиада% ойындар N-COMPOUND-PX-PL ; ! "The Olympic Games"
Жазғы% Олимпиада% ойындары:Жазғы% Олимпиада% ойындар N-COMPOUND-PX-PL ; ! "The Summer Olympic Games"
сот% жүйесі:сот% жүйе N-COMPOUND-PX ; !"Use/MT"
факт:факт N6 ; ! "fact"
аттас:аттас N1 ; ! ""
 LEXICON ProperNouns
Бангладеш:Бангладеш NP-TOP ; ! ""
Бірлескен% араб% эмираттары:Бірлескен% араб% эмираттар NP-TOP-COMPOUND ; ! "UAE"
Ирландия:Ирландия NP-TOP ; ! "Ireland"
Кеңес% Одағы:Кеңес% Одақ NP-TOP-COMPOUND ; ! "Soviet Union"
Маршалл% Аралдары:Маршалл% Аралдар NP-TOP-COMPOUND ; ! "Marshall Islands" 
Эфес:Эфес NP-TOP ; !"Use/MT"
Қырғыз% АССР:Қырғыз% АССР%{э%}%{й%} NP-TOP-ASSR ;
Қазақ% КСР:Қазақ% КСР%{э%}%{й%} NP-TOP-ASSR ; ! ""
Украина% ССР:Украина% ССР%{э%}%{й%} NP-TOP-ASSR ; ! ""
Венди:Венди NP-ANT-F ; !"Use/MT"
Аб:Аб NP-ANT-M ; !"Use/MT"
Кая:Кая NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Кристоф:Кристоф NP-ANT-M ; !"Use/MT"
Сталбек:Сталбек NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Хадиша:Хадиша NP-ANT-F ; ! "Xadıysha" (Arabic)
Янукович:Януко NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Анатольевич:Анатолье NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Гашпорович:Гашпоро NP-PAT-VICH ; ! "" ! Use/MT 
Горький:Горький NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Репин:Репин NP-COG-M ; ! ""
Гитлер:Гитлер NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Кроули:Кроули NP-COG-MF ; !"Use/MT"
Фернандес:Фернандес NP-COG-MF ; !"Use/MT"
Боқаев:Боқаев NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Калинин:Калинин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Ксенофонтов:Ксенофонтов NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Мухин:Мухин NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
Савуков:Савуков NP-COG-OB ; ! ""
Тәжін:Тәжін NP-COG-IN ; ! ""
ABC:ABC NP-ORG-LAT ; ! ""
Plc:Plc NP-ORG-LAT ; ! ""
Боруссия% Дортмунд:Боруссия% Дортмунд%{☭%} NP-ORG ; ! "Borussia Dortmund"
ҚМЭБИ:ҚМЭБИ NP-ORG-ABBR ; ! "KIMEP"
ЖСДП:ЖСДП NP-ORG-ABBR ; ! "Жалпыұлттық социал демократиялық партия=Гомуммилли Социаль Демократик Партия=International Social Democratic Party"
Қазмырыш:Қазмырыш NP-ORG ; ! ""
КОНМЕБОЛ:КОНМЕБОЛ NP-AL-ABBR ; ! ""
Түрік% Әуежолдары:Түрік% Әуежолдар NP-ORG-COMPOUND ; ! "Turkish Airways"
Чемпиондар% лигасы:Чемпиондар% лига NP-ORG-COMPOUND ; ! "UEFA Champions League"
Шеврон:Шеврон NP-ORG ; ! ""
Артемида:Артемида NP-AL ; ! ""
Омичъ:Омичъ NP-AL ; ! ""
Кухруд:Кухруд NP-TOP-RUS ; ! ""
Серхед:Серхед NP-TOP-RUS ; ! ""
Шираз:Шираз NP-TOP-RUS ; ! ""
 LEXICON Adverbs
ксозаша:ксозаша ADV-LANG ; ! ""
сербхорватша:сербхорватша ADV-LANG ; ! ""
ұйғұрша:ұйғұрша ADV-LANG ; ! "Uyghur"
 LEXICON Abbreviations
ӘЧ:ӘЧ NP-AL-ABBR ; ! ""
LEXICON Guesser
Боголюбский:Боголюбский NP-COG-M ; ! ""
ЖХЛ:ЖХЛ NP-TOP-ABBR ; ! ""
ЖКО:ЖКО NP-TOP-ABBR ; ! ""
МТ:МТ NP-TOP-ABBR ; ! ""
ешқандай:ешқандай DET-IND ; ! "such"
